Utah statutes.
7-1-1006.   Inapplicable to certain official investigations.
(1)  Sections 7-1-1002 and 7-1-1003 do not apply if an examination of a record
is a part of an official investigation by:
(a)  local police;
(b)  a sheriff;
(c)  a peace officer;
(d)  a city attorney;
(e)  a county attorney;
(f)  a district attorney;
(g)  the attorney general;
(h)  the Department of Public Safety;
(i)  the Office of Recovery Services of the Department of Human Services;
(j)  the Insurance Department;
(k)  the Department of Commerce;
(l)  the Benefit Payment Control Unit or the Payment Error Prevention Unit of
the Department of Workforce Services;
(m)  the state auditor; or
(n)  the State Tax Commission.
(2)  Except for the Office of Recovery Services, if a governmental entity
listed in Subsection (1) seeks a record, the entity shall obtain the record as
follows:
(a)  if the record is a nonprotected record, by request in writing that:
(i)  certifies that an official investigation is being conducted; and
(ii)  is signed by a representative of the governmental entity that is
conducting the official investigation; or
(b)  if the record is a protected record, by obtaining:
(i)  a subpoena authorized by statute;
(ii)  other legal process:
(A)  ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction; and
(B)  served upon the financial institution; or
(iii)  written permission from all account holders of the account referenced
in the record to be examined.
(3)  If the Office of Recovery Services seeks a record, the Office of Recovery
Services shall obtain the record pursuant to:
(a)  Subsection 62A-11-104(1)(g);
(b)  Section 62A-11-304.1;
(c)  Section 62A-11-304.5; or
(d)  Title IV, Part D of the Social Security Act as codified in 42 U.S.C. 651
et seq.
(4)  A financial institution may not give notice to an account holder or
person named or referenced within the record disclosed pursuant to Subsection
(2)(a).
(5)  In accordance with Section 7-1-1004, the governmental entity conducting
the official investigation that obtains a record from a financial institution
under this section shall reimburse the financial institution for costs
reasonably and directly incurred by the financial institution.
